Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1131.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Public schools; automated external defibrillators; department of education; reporting and posting requirements; delayed repeal; definition A. On or before November 1, 2026, each school district and charter school in this state shall submit a report to the department of education that includes the following information: 1. The number of automated external defibrillators that the school district or charter school has at each school campus. 2. The number of school employees at each school campus, including indirect employment through a third-party contractor, who are trained in providing cardiopulmonary resuscitation and first aid and in the use of automated external defibrillators. 3. A statement indicating whether the school district or charter school has adopted a plan that both: (a) Outlines the policies and procedures for school personnel who might respond to an incident in which an individual experiences sudden cardiac arrest or a similar life-threatening emergency. (b) Is consistent with guidelines prescribed by a nationally recognized organization that is focused on emergency cardiovascular care. B. On or before December 1, 2026, the department of education shall compile the reports received pursuant to subsection A of this section and shall: 1. Submit a summary and the compiled reports to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the director of the joint legislative budget committee and the director of the department of health services. 2. Submit a copy of the summary and compiled reports to the secretary of state. 3. Post the summary and compiled reports on the department of education's website. C. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2027. D. For the purposes of this section, "automated external defibrillator" has the same meaning prescribed in section 36-2261, Arizona Revised Statutes. Sec. 2. Appropriation; department of education; exemption A. The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of education. B. The department may use not more than $50,000 for the purpose of implementing section 1 of this act. The department shall distribute the remaining monies appropriated pursuant to subsection A of this section to public schools that offer instruction to students in any combination of kindergarten programs and grades one through twelve. The department shall prioritize distributions to public schools that are rural as defined in section 15-249.13, Arizona Revised Statutes. A public school may use monies that are distributed pursuant to this subsection to purchase or maintain automated external defibrillators as defined in section 36-2261, Arizona Revised Statutes. C. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.